Florida, session 2026, HB1371.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsections (7) through (12) of section
458.3475, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8)
through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (7) is added to
that section, to read:
458.3475 Anesthesiologist assistants.—
(7) TEMPORARY LICENSURE.—
(a) The department shall issue a temporary license to
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant who
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1371-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1371 2026
meets all of the following criteria:
1. Has graduated from an approved anesthesiologist
assistant program.
2. Has applied for and is awaiting results of the
certification examination administered by the National
Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants.
3. Has submitted a completed application for licensure and
paid all applicable fees.
4. Has not committed any act or offense that would
constitute grounds for denial of licensure under this chapter.
5. Has submitted to a background screening pursuant to s.
456.0135.
(b) A temporary license issued under this subsection:
1. Is valid for a period not to exceed 180 days after the
date of issuance.
2. Is nonrenewable.
3. Automatically expires upon the applicant's passage of
the certification examination and issuance of a full license, or
upon the applicant's failure of the certification examination.
(c) A temporary licensee may practice only under the
direct supervision of a licensed anesthesiologist who has filed
a written protocol with the department in accordance with
subsection (2).
(d) The boards shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection, including application procedures and supervision
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1371-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1371 2026
requirements.
Section 2. Present subsections (7) through (12) of section
459.023, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8)
through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (7) is added to
that section, to read:
459.023 Anesthesiologist assistants.—
(7) TEMPORARY LICENSURE.—
(a) The department shall issue a temporary license to
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant who
meets all of the following criteria:
1. Has graduated from an approved anesthesiologist
assistant program.
2. Has applied for and is awaiting results of the
certification examination administered by the National
Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants.
3. Has submitted a completed application for licensure and
paid all applicable fees.
4. Has not committed any act or offense that would
constitute grounds for denial of licensure under this chapter.
5. Has submitted to a background screening pursuant to s.
456.0135.
(b) A temporary license issued under this subsection:
1. Is valid for a period not to exceed 180 days after the
date of issuance.
2. Is nonrenewable.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1371-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1371 2026
3. Automatically expires upon the applicant's passage of
the certification examination and issuance of a full license, or
upon the applicant's failure of the certification examination.
(c) A temporary licensee may practice only under the
direct supervision of a licensed anesthesiologist who has filed
a written protocol with the department in accordance with
subsection (2).
(d) The boards shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection, including application procedures and supervision
requirements.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1371-00